Colorado statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Matters
PART 2
RIGHTS OF MARRIED PERSONS

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-090, see section 1 of chapter 72, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

14-2-201. Property ownership.

The property, real and personal, that a person in this state owns at the time of his or her marriage, and the rents, issues, profits, and proceeds thereof, and any real, personal, or mixed property that comes to him or her by descent, devise, or bequest, or the gift of any person except his or her husband or wife, including presents or gifts from his or her husband or wife, such as jewelry, silver, tableware, watches, money, and apparel, remains his or her sole and separate property, notwithstanding his or her marriage, and is not subject to the disposal of his or her husband or wife or liable for his or her debts.

Source:

R.S.

p. 454, § 1.

G.L.

§ 1747.

G.S.

§ 2266.

R.S. 08:

§ 4181.

C.L.

§ 5576.

CSA:

C. 108, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 90-2-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 90-2-1.

L. 2018:

Entire part amended, (SB 18-090), ch. 72, p. 637, § 2, effective August 8.

14-2-202. Married person may sue and be sued.

A person, while married, may sue and be sued, in all matters having relation to his or her property, person, or reputation, in the same manner as if he or she were unmarried.

Source:

R.S.

p. 455, § 3.

G.L.

§ 1749.

G.S.

§ 2268.

R.S. 08:

§ 4182.

C.L.

§ 5577.

CSA:

C. 108, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 90-2-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 90-2-2.

L. 2018:

Entire part amended, (SB 18-090), ch. 72, p. 638, § 2, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the rule of civil procedure authorizing married women to sue as if sole, see C.R.C.P. 17(b).

14-2-203. Rights in separate business.

A married person may carry on any trade or business and perform any labor or services on his or her sole and separate account, and the earnings of a married person from his or her trade, business, labor, or services is his or her sole and separate property and may be used and invested by him or her in his or her own name. Property acquired by trade, business, and services by the married person and the proceeds may be taken on any execution against the person.

Source:

R.S.

p. 455, § 6.

G.L.

§ 1752.

G.S.

§ 2271.

R.S. 08:

§ 4183.

C.L.

§ 5578.

CSA:

C. 108, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 90-2-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 90-2-3.

L. 2018:

Entire part amended, (SB 18-090), ch. 72, p. 638, § 2, effective August 8.

14-2-204. Not to affect marriage settlements.

Nothing in sections 14-2-201 to 14-2-206 invalidates any marriage settlement or contract.

Source:

R.S.

p. 455, § 7.

G.L.

§ 1753.

G.S.

§ 2272.

R.S. 08:

§ 4184.

C.L.

§ 5579.

CSA:

C. 108, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 90-2-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 90-2-4.

L. 2018:

Entire part amended, (SB 18-090), ch. 72, p. 638, § 2, effective August 8.

14-2-205. Married person's land subject to judgment.

When a person against whom liability exists marries and has or acquires lands, judgment on such liability may be rendered against him or her and his or her husband or wife jointly, to be levied on such lands only.

Source:

R.S.

p. 455, § 10.

G.L.

§ 1756.

G.S.

§ 2275.

R.S. 08:

§ 4187.

C.L.

§ 5582.

CSA:

C. 108, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 90-2-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 90-2-7.

L. 2018:

Entire part amended, (SB 18-090), ch. 72, p. 638, § 2, effective August 8.

14-2-206. Spouse cannot convey other spouse's lands.

The separate deed of a spouse conveys no interest in the other spouse's lands.

Source:

R.S.

p. 455, § 12.

G.L.

§ 1757.

G.S.

§ 2276.

R.S. 08:

§ 4188.

C.L.

§ 5583.

CSA:

C. 108, § 8.

CRS 53:

§ 90-2-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 90-2-8.

L. 2018:

Entire part amended, (SB 18-090), ch. 72, p. 638, § 2, effective August 8.

14-2-207. Spouse may convey lands as if unmarried.

A person, while married, may bargain, sell, and convey his or her real and personal property and enter into any contract in reference to the same as if he or she were unmarried.

Source:

R.S.

p. 455, § 2.

L. 1874:

p. 185, § 1.

G.L.

§ 1759.

G.S.

§ 2278.

R.S. 08:

§ 4190.

C.L.

§ 5585.

CSA:

C. 108, § 10.

CRS 53:

§ 90-2-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 90-2-9.

L. 2018:

Entire part amended, (SB 18-090), ch. 72, p. 638, § 2, effective August 8.

14-2-208. Married person may contract.

A person, while married, may contract debts in his or her own name and upon his or her own credit, and may execute promissory notes, bonds, bills of exchange, and other instruments in writing, and may enter into any contract the same as if he or she were unmarried. In all cases where any suit or other legal proceedings are instituted against the married person and any judgment, decree, or order is rendered or pronounced against the married person, the same may be enforced by execution or other process against the married person as if he or she were unmarried.

Source:

L. 1874:

p. 185, § 3.

G.L.

§ 1761.

G.S.

§ 2280.

R.S. 08:

§ 4191.

C.L.

§ 5586.

CSA:

C. 108, § 11.

CRS 53:

§ 90-2-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 90-2-10.

L. 2018:

Entire part amended, (SB 18-090), ch. 72, p. 638, § 2, effective August 8.

14-2-209. Loss of consortium.

In all actions for a tort by a married person, both spouses have an equal right to recover for loss of consortium of his or her spouse.

Source:

L. 61:

p. 560, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 90-2-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 90-2-11.

L. 2018:

Entire part amended, (SB 18-090), ch. 72, p. 638, § 2, effective August 8.

14-2-210. Domicile.

The right of a person to become a resident domiciled in the state of Colorado must not be denied or abridged because of sex or marital status, and the common law rule that the domicile of a married person is that of his or her spouse is no longer in effect in this state.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 824, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 90-2-12.

L. 73:

p. 1022, § 1.

L. 2018:

Entire part amended, (SB 18-090), ch. 72, p. 638, § 2, effective August 8.